Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.360

Violations—Prosecuting attorney may bring criminal proceedings.

The director may refer such evidence as may be available concerning violations of this chapter or of any rule or order under this chapter to the proper prosecuting attorney, who may in his or her discretion, with or without such a reference, institute the appropriate criminal proceedings under this chapter.

[ 1986 c 14 s 37.]